Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.08.050

Terms of directors—Generally.

(1) The terms of the initial directors of a corporation expire at the first shareholders' meeting at which directors are elected.

(2) The terms of all other directors expire at the next annual shareholders' meeting following their election unless (a) their terms are staggered under RCW 23B.08.060 then at the applicable second or third annual shareholders' meeting following their election; or (b) their terms are otherwise governed by RCW 23B.05.050, except to the extent (i) the terms are otherwise provided in a bylaw adopted pursuant to RCW 23B.10.205, or (ii) a shorter term is specified in the articles of incorporation in the event of a director nominee failing to receive a specified vote for election.

(3) A decrease in the number of directors does not shorten an incumbent director's term.

(4) The term of a director elected to fill a vacancy expires at the next shareholders' meeting at which directors are elected.

(5) Except to the extent otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or pursuant to RCW 23B.10.205, if a bylaw electing to be governed by that section is in effect, despite the expiration of a director's term, the director continues to serve until the director's successor is elected and qualified or there is a decrease in the number of directors.

[ 2007 c 467 s 2; 1994 c 256 s 30; 1989 c 165 s 84.]

NOTES:

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.